Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,221
Emergency plan review.

Each local emergency planning committee shall provide the emergency plan to the governing bodies having jurisdiction in the emergency planning district for review prior to submitting the plan to the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency. The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall review the plan and make recommendations to the committee on revisions to the plan that may be necessary to ensure coordination of the plan with emergency plans of other emergency planning districts. To the maximum extent practicable, such review shall not delay implementation of the plan.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 31;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 52.
July 1, 2026